Louisiana, session 2026, HB124.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:2146(A)(introductory paragraph) and (1)(introductory paragraph),
(h), and (i) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2146. Composition of the commission
A. The commission shall be composed of twenty nineteen members as
follows:
(1) Eighteen Seventeen of the commission members shall be the following:
* * *
(h) One current or former district court judge with experience in criminal law
matters, selected by the president of the Louisiana District Court Judges Association.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 124 ENROLLED
(i) One current or former district court judge with experience in family law
matters, selected by the president of the Louisiana District Court Judges Association.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 46:2146(A)(1)(p) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.